Washington statutes.
RCW 36.83.130

Improvements—Ownership.

Any road or bridge improvements financed in whole by funds of a service district, including but not limited to proceeds of bonds issued by a service district, shall be owned by that service district. Improvements financed jointly by a service district and the county or city within which the improvements are located may be owned jointly by the service district and that county or city pursuant to an interlocal agreement.

[ 1996 c 292 s 6.]